Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 5

Select Oversight Committee on TennCare [Repealed]

3-15-501. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 2. 1999, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011. Acts 1994, ch. 830, §§ 2-10; 1996, ch. 1039, §§ 1-6; 1998, ch. 835, § 1; 1999, ch. 226, §§ 1-3; 2000, ch. 798, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2004, ch. 623, § 1; 2009, ch. 562, § 1; 2010, ch. 1030, § 1; 2010, ch. 1079, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 2, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-502. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 3; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-503. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 4; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-504. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 5; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-505. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 6; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-506. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 7; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 2; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-507. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 8; 1999, ch. 226, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-508. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 9; Acts 1998, ch. 835, § 1; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; 2010, ch. 1079, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-509. [Repealed.]

Acts 1994, ch. 830, § 10; 1999, ch. 226, §§ 1, 3; 2004, ch. 623, § 1; 2009, ch. 562, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.

3-15-510. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1039, §§ 1-6; 1999, ch. 226, § 1; 2000, ch. 798, § 1; 2010, ch. 1030, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§3-15-501 —3-15-510 concerned the select oversight committee on TennCare.